Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska75-146
Common carrier other than a railroad; consolidation or increase in stock; jurisdiction of commission.

The capital stock of any common carrier other than a railroad shall not be increased for any purpose except after public notice for sixty days. No common carrier other than a railroad shall consolidate its stock, property, franchise, or earnings, in whole or in part, with any other competing common carrier without permission of the commission, and in no case shall any consolidation take place except on public notice of at least thirty days to all stockholders as provided in the rules of the commission.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. I, § 46, p. 1371;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 59.